Alaska statutes. Title 39. Public Officers and Employees.
Article 6. Service.

Administrative Code. —

For service under the defined benefit plan, see 2 AAC 35, art. 4.

Sec. 39.35.300.
Employment with the state.

An active employee is entitled to credited service for periods of employment with the state after January 1, 1961, regardless of the office, department, division, or agency of the state in which the person was employed. For purposes of AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

, the University of Alaska is not an office, department, division, or agency of the state. Service credit may not be granted under AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

for service that is creditable under the teachers’ retirement system, AS 14.25, or for a person’s service as a public officer, as defined in AS

39.52.960

, a legislator, or a legislative director, if the service occurs on or after the date the person commits a criminal offense from which a pension forfeiture under AS

37.10.310

results.

A permanent part-time employee of the state receives credited service on a pro rata basis to that which would have been earned as a permanent full-time employee.

A noncertificated employee of the Alaska Vocational Technical Center or a state boarding school who first becomes a member of the plan on or after July 1, 1999, may, within 90 days after the employee first joins the plan, make an election under this subsection to have the years of service that the employee earns as a noncertificated employee determined using the table for service on or after July 1, 1969, that is set out in the definition of “year of service” in AS

14.25.220

. A noncertificated employee of the Alaska Vocational Technical Center or a state boarding school who is an active member of the plan on July 1, 1999, may, within 180 days after July 1, 1999, make the election. A member of the plan who is an inactive member on July 1, 1999, and who is later employed as a noncertificated employee of the Alaska Vocational Technical Center or a state boarding school may, within 90 days after beginning the subsequent employment, make the election. An election under this subsection is irrevocable except as provided in (d) of this section and shall be made in writing on a form provided by the administrator. The election applies to the employee’s service earned for the school year in which the election is accepted by the administrator and applies to all subsequent employment as a noncertificated employee of a state boarding school, a school district or regional educational attendance area, the special education service agency, or the Alaska Vocational Technical Center. An employee who makes an election under this subsection shall pay the contribution surcharge as set out in AS

39.35.160(c)

.

A noncertificated employee who has made an election under (c) of this section and who thereafter changes employment status from working for less than a full year, whether part-time or full time, to working for a full year, whether part-time or full-time, may, between July 1 and September 30, revoke the election and cease payment of the contribution surcharge. A revocation under this subsection is retroactive to July 1 of the school year, as defined in AS

14.25.220

, in which the revocation is made.

A noncertificated employee who has not made an election under (c) of this section who changes employment status from working for a full year, whether part-time or full-time, to working for less than a full year, whether part-time or full-time, may, between July 1 and September 30, make the election and begin paying the contribution surcharge. The election is retroactive to July 1 of the school year, as defined in AS

14.25.220

, in which the election is made.

History.

(§ 11 ch 143 SLA 1960; am § 4 ch 155 SLA 1966; am § 4 ch 27 SLA 1976; am § 26 ch 128 SLA 1977; am § 29 ch 13 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 22 SLA 1999; am §§ 37, 38 ch 68 SLA 2000; am § 51 ch 47 SLA 2007)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “plan” was substituted for “system” in (c) of this section and “AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

” was substituted for “this chapter”.

Administrative Code. —

For service under the defined benefit plan ( AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

), see 2 AAC 35, art. 4.

Sec. 39.35.310.
Employment with other employers.

An active employee is entitled to credited service for periods of employment with a political subdivision or a public organization beginning with the effective date of the employer’s participation in the plan. The employee is also entitled to credited service for periods of employment as designated in the employer’s participation agreement.

A permanent part-time employee of a political subdivision or a public organization receives credited service on a basis proportionate to that which would have been earned as a permanent full-time employee.

A noncertificated employee of a school district, a regional educational attendance area, or the special education service agency who first becomes a member of the plan on or after July 1, 1999, may, within 90 days after the employee first joins the plan, make an election under this subsection to have the years of service that the employee earns as a noncertificated employee determined using the table for service on or after July 1, 1969, that is set out in the definition of “year of service” in AS

14.25.220

. A noncertificated employee of a school district, a regional educational attendance area, or the special education service agency who is an active member of the plan on July 1, 1999, may, within 180 days after July 1, 1999, make the election. A member of the plan who is an inactive member on July 1, 1999, and who later is employed as a noncertificated employee of a school district, a regional educational attendance area, or the special education service agency may, within 90 days after beginning the subsequent employment, make the election. An election under this subsection is irrevocable except as provided in (d) of this section and shall be made in writing on a form provided by the administrator. The election applies to the employee’s service earned for the school year in which the election is accepted by the administrator and applies to all subsequent employment as a noncertificated employee of a state boarding school, a school district or regional educational attendance area, the special education service agency, or the Alaska Vocational Technical Center. An employee who makes an election under this subsection shall pay the contribution surcharge as set out in AS

39.35.160(c)

.

A noncertificated employee who has made an election under (c) of this section and who thereafter changes employment status from working for less than a full year, whether part-time or full-time, to working for a full year, whether part-time or full-time, may, between July 1 and September 30, revoke the election and cease payment of the contribution surcharge. A revocation under this subsection is retroactive to the beginning of the school year, as defined in AS

14.25.220

, in which the revocation was made.

A noncertificated employee who has not made an election under (c) of this section who changes employment status from working for a full year, whether part-time or full-time, to working for less than a full year may, between July 1 and September 30, make the election and begin paying the contribution surcharge. The election is retroactive to July 1 of the school year, as defined in AS

14.25.220

, in which the election was made.

History.

(§ 12 ch 143 SLA 1960; am § 27 ch 128 SLA 1977; am § 30 ch 13 SLA 1980; am § 3 ch 22 SLA 1999; am §§ 39, 40 ch 68 SLA 2000)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “plan” was substituted for “system” in this section.

Administrative Code. —

For service under the defined benefit plan ( AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

), see 2 AAC 35, art. 4.

Sec. 39.35.320.
Transfers between employers. [Repealed, § 55 ch 128 SLA 1977.]

Sec. 39.35.330.
Leave of absence.

A leave of absence with pay authorized by an employer is not considered as interrupting employment. If the employee is a permanent part-time employee, credited service shall be granted on a basis proportionate to that which would have been earned as a permanent full-time employee.

A leave or leaves of absence without pay exceeding 10 accumulated working days in any calendar year or layoff status authorized by an employer shall be considered as an interruption of employment and credited service may not be granted.

Notwithstanding (b) of this section, an employee who takes more than 10 days leave of absence without pay in a calendar year because the employee is unable to work due to an on-the-job injury or occupational illness for which the employee is receiving benefits under AS 23.30 may elect to receive credited service for the time on leave of absence without pay status. When an employee elects to receive credited service under this subsection, an indebtedness is established. The amount of the indebtedness is equal to the contributions that the employee would have made if the employee had been working, less the sum of contributions that the employee made for those periods of time and an amount equal to contributions that would have been made for the first 10 days of leave without pay. Interest as prescribed by regulation accrues on the indebtedness beginning on the date that the employee returns to work or terminates employment. If there is an outstanding indebtedness at the time the employee is appointed to retirement, benefits shall be actuarially adjusted.

An employee of a school district, a regional educational attendance area, or a state boarding school who is assaulted while on the job and who, as a result of a physical injury from the assault, is placed on leave without pay, whether or not the employee receives workers’ compensation benefits under AS 23.30 for the injury, is entitled to accrue credited service while the employee, because of the injury, is on leave-without-pay status or is receiving the benefits under AS 23.30. Entitlement to credited service under this subsection ends when the employee is eligible to receive benefits under AS

39.35.370(a)

or

39.35.410(a)

.

History.

(§ 14 ch 143 SLA 1960; am § 28 ch 128 SLA 1977; am § 1 ch 64 SLA 1987; am § 24 ch 106 SLA 1988; am § 6 ch 52 SLA 2000)

Cross references. —

For a provision relating to ch. 52, SLA 2000, which enacted subsection (d), see sec. 7, ch. 52, SLA 2000 in the 2000 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For service under the defined benefit plan ( AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

), see 2 AAC 35, art. 4.

Sec. 39.35.340.
Military service.

A vested employee is entitled to credited service for active military service in the armed forces of the United States, either by enlistment or induction, if the employee received a discharge under honorable conditions and is not entitled to receive retirement benefits from the United States government for the same service. The credited service allowed may not exceed an aggregate period of five years. Benefits are not payable on credited service for military service unless the employee makes retroactive contributions to the plan for the period of time that service credit is claimed. However, if the employee was in the employ of an employer on the date of entry into the armed forces and returned to the employ of an employer within 90 days after the date of discharge from military service, the employee is not required to make retroactive contributions under this plan for the period of credited service.

In order to obtain credited service under this section, an employee shall make an election to do so and shall verify the period of military service. When eligibility for credited service for military service has been established, an indebtedness shall be determined as follows:

determine the employee’s actual compensation, or the calculated annual compensation for those employees working less than 12 months, during the calendar year 1976 or the year in which an employee first becomes vested under AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

, whichever is later;

multiply the amount determined under (1) of this subsection by the number of years of military service credited under this section;

multiply the product determined under (2) of this subsection by six percent for members who are first eligible to claim this military service before January 1, 1987, or eight and one-half percent for members who are first eligible to claim this military service on or after January 1, 1987.

A retired employee on July 1, 1976, is eligible to receive increased benefits based upon military service as described in (a) of this section. To receive credited service for military service, a retired employee shall verify the military service. When verified, a retired employee is entitled to receive an increased benefit that shall be actuarially adjusted to reflect the employee’s indebtedness for that credit. The indebtedness shall be calculated in the same manner as described in (b) of this section except that it shall be based on the average monthly compensation used in calculating the benefit. The effective date of this increased benefit is the beginning of the month following that in which eligibility has been established.

The credited service granted under this section may not be used to satisfy the credited service requirements for normal retirement.

A deferred vested employee on July 1, 1976, is eligible to claim credited service under (a) of this section. In order to obtain credited service under this section, such an employee shall make an election to do so and shall verify the period of military service. When eligibility for military service has been established, an indebtedness shall be determined as follows: the employee’s actual compensation, or the calculated annual compensation for those employees working less than 12 months, during the calendar year the employee terminated, shall be multiplied by six percent; this product shall then be multiplied by the number of years of military service credit under this section. Interest as prescribed by regulation accrues on this indebtedness commencing July 1, 1978. Any outstanding indebtedness that exists at the time a person is appointed to retirement necessitates an actuarial adjustment to the benefits payable based upon that military service.

An employee may not be credited with a period of active military service in the armed forces of the United States under this section if credit for that military service was granted under AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

.

A surviving spouse receiving or entitled to receive benefits under AS

39.35.420(b)

,

39.35.430

, or

39.35.440

or benefits under a joint and survivor option filed under AS

39.35.450

is eligible to receive increased benefits based on military service as described in (a) of this section. To receive credited service for military service, the surviving spouse shall verify the employee’s military service. When verified, the surviving spouse is entitled to receive an increased benefit which shall be actuarially adjusted to reflect the indebtedness for that credit. The indebtedness shall be calculated in the same manner as described in (b) of this section except that it shall be based on the average monthly compensation used in calculating the benefit. Benefits payable under this subsection are effective the first day of the month following that in which eligibility has been established.

The combined period of military service claimed under this section and under AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

may not exceed five years.

Notwithstanding (d) of this section, a member who retires as a peace officer or firefighter may elect to use five or fewer years of credited service granted under this section in computing years of credited service under AS

39.35.535(c)

. When eligibility for credited service for military service has been established and an election under this subsection has been made, an indebtedness in addition to the indebtedness determined under (b) of this section shall be determined for each year of military service used under this subsection, in an amount based on the increase, if any, in the present value of future benefits for that year as determined by the department.

For indebtedness determined under this section, interest as prescribed by regulation accrues beginning on July 1, 1977, or one year following the date a person first becomes vested, whichever is later. An outstanding indebtedness for pension benefits that exists at the time a person is appointed to retirement necessitates an actuarial adjustment to the pension benefits payable based on credited military service.

Credited service under (a) of this section includes service as a

foreign service officer, a foreign service reserve officer, or a limited foreign service reserve officer with the United States Department of State in Vietnam, Cambodia, or Laos from August 4, 1964, through November 7, 1975; and

member of the United States Merchant Marine Service from December 7, 1941, through September 30, 1945.

History.

(§ 15 ch 143 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 123 SLA 1976; am § 29 ch 128 SLA 1977; am § 6 ch 174 SLA 1978; am §§ 31 — 36 ch 13 SLA 1980; am § 46 ch 137 SLA 1982; am §§ 16 — 18 ch 82 SLA 1986; am §§ 97, 98 ch 9 FSSLA 2005; am §§ 1, 2 ch 81 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, in this section “plan” was substituted for “system” and “AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

” was substituted for “this chapter”.

Subsections (i) and (j) were enacted as (j) and (k); relettered in 2014, at which time former (i) was relettered as (k).

Administrative Code. —

For service under the defined benefit plan ( AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

), see 2 AAC 35, art. 4.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective July 11, 2014, in (b)(1), inserted “determine” at the beginning, and deleted “, multiplied by” at the end, in (b)(2), inserted “multiply the amount determined under (1) of this subsection by” at the beginning, and deleted “, and this product multiplied by” at the end, in (b)(3), inserted “multiply the amount determined under (2) of this subsection by” at the beginning, and deleted “Interest as prescribed by regulation accrues on this indebtedness beginning on July 1, 1977, or one year following the date a person first becomes vested, whichever is later. Any outstanding indebtedness that exists at the time a person is appointed to retirement necessitates an actuarial adjustment to the benefits payable based upon that military service.” at the end; added (j) [now (i)] and (k) [now (j)].

Editor’s notes. —

Section 55, ch. 82, SLA 1986, provides that notwithstanding (b) or (e) of this section, interest did not accrue on service claimed under (i) of this section “until July 1, 1987, or one year following the date on which a person first becomes vested, whichever is later.”

Section 56, ch. 82, SLA 1986, provides that “retired employees, deferred vested employees, and surviving spouses on July 1, 1986, are entitled to claim credited service or increased benefits for service claimed under (i) of this section in accordance with (c), (e) and (g) of this section.”

Section 57, ch. 82, SLA 1986 provides:
“Sections 16, 22-23, 25-27, 42-45, and 50 of this Act apply only to members first hired under the Public Employees’ Retirement System after June 30, 1986.”

Legislative history reports. —

For letter of intent for FCCS HB 198, which became ch. 123 SLA 1976 and amended this section, see 1976 Senate Journal 1359.

Sec. 39.35.342.
Village public safety officer service.

A vested employee is entitled to credited service for employment as a village public safety officer under the program established under AS

18.65.670

for which the employee has not otherwise received credited service under this plan. An employee is not entitled to credited service for employment as a village public safety officer unless the employee was employed as a village public safety officer for at least one year. The credited service claimed under this section may not exceed five years. Benefits are not payable on credited service for village public safety officer service under this section unless the employee makes retroactive contributions to the plan for the period of time that service credit is claimed.

In order to obtain credited service under this section, an employee shall make an election to do so and shall verify the period of service as a village public safety officer. When eligibility for credited service for village public safety officer service has been established, an indebtedness shall be determined. The amount of the indebtedness is equal to the full actuarial cost of providing benefits based on the service as a village public safety officer. Interest as prescribed by regulation accrues on this indebtedness beginning on the date the actuarial cost is established. Any outstanding indebtedness that exists at the time a person is appointed to retirement necessitates an actuarial adjustment to the benefits payable based upon service as a village public safety officer.

The credited service granted under this section may not be used to satisfy the credited service requirements for normal retirement.

An employee is not entitled to credited service under this section if the employee is entitled to receive retirement benefits from another employer for the same service under a retirement plan that provides benefits based on defined benefits.

History.

(§ 1 ch 92 SLA 1998; am § 10 ch 97 SLA 2001; am § 25 ch 92 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “plan” was substituted for “system” in this section.

Cross references. —

For the intent of the legislature related to the 2001 amendments to subsection (a) see § 1, ch. 97, SLA 2001 in the 2001 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For service under the defined benefit plan ( AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

), see 2 AAC 35, art. 4.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 13, ch. 97, SLA 2001 provides that the amendments to subsection (a) by § 10, ch. 97, SLA 2001 do “not modify the terms of a contract between the state and a nonprofit regional corporation in existence on the effective date of this Act.” The effective date of § 10, ch. 97, SLA 2001, which enacted this section, was March 1, 2002.

Sec. 39.35.345.
Temporary service credit.

A vested employee is entitled to credited service for periods in which the employee regularly rendered full-time personal service to an employer but was not qualified to participate in the plan because of the exclusion of temporary workers as described in AS

39.35.680

(22)(C)(iii). Benefits are not payable on this credited service unless the employee makes retroactive contributions to the plan for the period of time that credited service is claimed. The retroactive contribution is the full actuarial cost of providing benefits for the credited service claimed.

To obtain credited service under this section, an employee shall elect to do so and shall verify the period of temporary service. When eligibility for temporary service credit has been established, an indebtedness shall be determined as provided in (a) of this section. Any outstanding indebtedness existing at the time an employee retires requires an actuarial adjustment to the benefits payable based on the temporary service. Interest as prescribed by regulation accrues on the indebtedness beginning

July 1, 1981, or one year following the date the employee first becomes vested, whichever is later, for an employee who claims temporary service credit no more than one year after the employee becomes vested;

the date of vesting, for an employee who becomes vested after June 30, 1980, who is claiming temporary service credit more than one year after vesting for service performed before the employee vested;

July 1, 1980, for an employee who became vested before July 1, 1980, who is claiming temporary service credit after June 30, 1981, for service performed before July 1, 1980;

one year after completing the temporary service, for an employee who was vested on the last day of employment as a temporary employee and who claims the temporary service no more than one year after completing the service;

on the date of completing the temporary service, for an employee who was vested on the last day of employment as a temporary employee and who claims temporary service more than one year after completing the service.

A deferred vested employee on July 1, 1980, is eligible to claim credited service under (a) of this section. To obtain credited service under this section, a deferred vested employee shall elect to do so and shall verify the period of temporary service. When eligibility for temporary service credit has been established, an indebtedness shall be determined as provided in (a) of this section. Interest as prescribed by regulation accrues on that indebtedness beginning July 1, 1981. Any outstanding indebtedness existing at the time a deferred vested employee retires requires an actuarial adjustment to the benefits payable based on the temporary service.

An employee may choose whether the credited service granted under this section is used to satisfy the credited service requirements for normal retirement under AS

39.35.370(a)(2)

or (3) or

39.35.385(f)

or is only used for the calculation of benefits. An election under this subsection is irrevocable and applies to all temporary credited service that the employee has accrued when the employee retires. An election under this subsection does not change the date that an employee is considered to have commenced participation in the plan under AS

39.35.120

.

Notwithstanding the requirement in (a) of this section that an employee be vested to claim credited service under this section, for purposes of a conditional service retirement benefit under AS

39.35.385(f)

, an employee may claim credited service under this section for temporary legislative employment before July 1, 1979, for which the employee has not received credited service under AS

39.35.360(g)

.

History.

(§ 29 ch 146 SLA 1980; am §§ 25, 26 ch 106 SLA 1988; am §§ 1, 2 ch 109 SLA 2000)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 39.35.156. Renumbered in 1980.

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “plan” was substituted for “system” in this section.
In 2005, “AS

39.35.680

(22)(C)(iii)” was substituted for “AS

39.35.680

(21)(C)(iii)” to reflect the 2005 renumbering of AS 39.25.680(21).

Cross references. —

For authority of a member of the public employees’ retirement system who has claimed credited service under this section before August 31, 2000, to make an election under (d) of this section as reenacted by sec. 1, ch. 109, SLA 2000, before the member’s appointment to retirement, see sec. 4, ch. 109, SLA 2000 in the 2000 Temporary & Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For service under the defined benefit plan ( AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

), see 2 AAC 35, art. 4.

Sec. 39.35.350.
Reinstatement of credited service. [Repealed, § 133 ch 9 FSSLA 2005.]

Sec. 39.35.360.
Earlier service.

An employee who completes three years of credited service with the state after January 1, 1961, for which the employee makes contributions required by AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

is entitled to credited service for service rendered (1) before January 1, 1961, as an employee of the state and former Territory of Alaska; (2) before January 1, 1961, as an employee of the United States government in Alaska, excluding service in the armed forces of the United States; (3) after January 1, 1961, as a peace officer, correctional officer, or firefighter of a participating political subdivision of the state if the employee is vested and is an active peace officer, correctional officer, or firefighter in the plan on or before January 1, 1983; or (4) after January 1, 1961, as a special officer commissioned by the state troopers if the employee has not otherwise received credit for the service and if the employee was employed on or before January 1, 1983, is vested, and has been an active special officer, peace officer, correctional officer, or firefighter in the plan. The retirement benefits payable to an employee under this section shall be reduced by the amount of the retirement pension benefits paid to the employee by the United States government for the same period of service.

An employee who, under (a) of this section, is entitled to credited service for employment before January 1, 1961, is not required to make retroactive contributions under AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

.

[Repealed, § 41 ch 146 SLA 1980.]

[Repealed, § 2 ch 26 SLA 1974.]

An employee of a detention facility provided by a local government unit to the territorial or state government under AS

33.30.031

or former AS

33.30.060

, who continues in state employment upon transfer of the facility to the state, is entitled to credited service for prior service with the facility if the employee remains in continuous employment with the state until July 1, 1976. To obtain credited service the employee is required to make retroactive contributions for the period of service between January 1, 1961, and the effective date of the transfer of the facility to the state.

A surviving spouse receiving or entitled to receive a surviving spouse’s pension under AS

39.35.440

or benefits under a joint and survivor option filed under AS

39.35.450

is eligible for increased benefits for any service credit authorized under (a) of this section, but not claimed or authorized by law before the employee’s death.

An employee is eligible to receive up to 10 years of credited service for service rendered before July 1, 1979, as a temporary employee of the legislature of the state or territory during legislative sessions. To receive retroactive credited service under this subsection, an employee shall claim the service before July 1, 2003, or before retiring, whichever occurs first. When the employee claims the service, an indebtedness of the employee to the plan shall be established. For benefits that do not vary based on the amount of retroactive credited service, the indebtedness shall be established on the date the employee claims the credit, with interest accruing on the indebtedness beginning July 1, 2003. For benefits that vary based on the amount of retroactive credited service, the indebtedness shall be established on the date the employee retires, with interest accruing on the indebtedness beginning on the date of retirement. Any outstanding indebtedness that exists at the time the employee retires requires an actuarial adjustment to the benefits that are based upon retroactive credited service under this subsection.

An employee of the state is eligible to receive credited service under AS

39.35.300(b)

for service rendered as a permanent part-time employee before January 1, 1976. When the employee claims retroactive credited service, an indebtedness of the employee to the plan shall be established. The amount of this indebtedness is equal to the contributions the employee would have made if the employee had been eligible for membership in the plan. The rate used to calculate the contributions may not be less than the rate in effect on January 1, 1961. Interest as prescribed by regulation accrues on the indebtedness beginning July 1, 1981, for employees claiming the service before that date, and beginning July 1, 1980, for employees claiming the service on or after July 1, 1981. Any outstanding indebtedness that exists at the time the employee retires requires an actuarial adjustment to the benefits that are based on retroactive credited service under this subsection.

An employee who completes three years of credited service with an employer, for which the employee makes contributions required by AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

, is entitled to credited service on a year-for-year basis for service credited in the Civil Service Retirement System, rendered as an employee of an Alaska Bureau of Indian Affairs (BIA) school, other than service as a teacher. When eligibility for retroactive credited service under this subsection has been established, an indebtedness of the employee to the plan shall be determined as follows: (1) the employee’s actual annual compensation, or the calculated annual compensation for an employee who works fewer than 12 months, for the most recent calendar year in which service is rendered to an employer before the calendar year in which the employee first becomes eligible to claim service under this subsection, multiplied by (2) the number of years of service in Alaska BIA schools that is credited under this subsection, and this product multiplied by (3) six percent for employees first eligible to claim this service before January 1, 1987, or eight and one-half percent for employees first eligible to claim this service on or after January 1, 1987. Interest as prescribed by regulation accrues on the indebtedness beginning on the date the employee may first claim the retroactive credited service. Any outstanding indebtedness that exists at the time the employee retires requires an actuarial adjustment to the benefits that are based on retroactive credited service under this subsection. A retirement benefit payable under this subsection for Alaska BIA service shall be reduced by an amount equal to the retirement benefits paid to the member by the United States government for the same service.

An employee who has not completed three years of credited service with an employer may claim credited service as an employee of an Alaska Bureau of Indian Affairs (BIA) school, other than service as a teacher under (i) of this section if, on the date of transfer of the Alaska BIA school to the state, the employee is employed at the school and needs fewer than three additional years of continuous full-time employment for normal retirement in the federal Civil Service Retirement System, and the employee completes a period of service with an employer, for which the employer makes contributions required by AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

, equal to the additional period of service that would have been required for that employee’s normal retirement under the federal Civil Service Retirement System. An employee who claims credited service under this subsection shall provide federal government verification of the employee’s federal Civil Service Retirement System status when the claim is filed.

A vested member is eligible to receive credited service for employment after January 1, 1961, as a peace officer or firefighter in a municipality that is an employer under this plan but that was not an employer at the time of the employment. A vested member who claims retroactive credited service on or after July 1, 1988, is indebted to the plan. The amount of the indebtedness is the full actuarial cost of providing benefits for the credited service claimed. Interest as established by regulation accrues on the indebtedness under this subsection beginning the first of the month following establishment of the indebtedness. Any outstanding indebtedness that exists at the time the officer or firefighter retires requires an actuarial adjustment to the benefits that are based on retroactive credited service under this subsection.

An administrative director of the Alaska Court System who withdraws from the judicial retirement system under AS

22.25.012(b)

is eligible for membership in the plan and shall receive credited service in this plan for service rendered as administrative director. To be eligible for membership in this plan under this subsection, the administrative director must contribute to the plan

the amount that would have been contributed if the administrative director had been a member during the period of the membership in the judicial retirement system; and

any contributions for service as administrative director refunded from the plan at the time the administrative director became a member of the judicial retirement system.

History.

(§ 17 ch 143 SLA 1960; am § 4 ch 80 SLA 1964; am §§ 5, 6 ch 155 SLA 1966; am § 4 ch 235 SLA 1968; am § 1 ch 55 SLA 1973; am §§ 1, 2 ch 26 SLA 1974; am §§ 1, 2 ch 245 SLA 1976; am §§ 31 — 33 ch 128 SLA 1977; am §§ 1, 7 ch 174 SLA 1978; am § 3 ch 81 SLA 1979; am § 10 ch 82 SLA 1979; am §§ 31, 32, 41 ch 146 SLA 1980; am §§ 48, 49 ch 137 SLA 1982; am § 2 ch 170 SLA 1984; am §§ 19 — 21 ch 82 SLA 1986; am § 10 ch 88 SLA 1986; am §§ 27, 28 ch 106 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 24 SLA 1992; am §§ 34, 35 ch 59 SLA 2002; am §§ 99, 100 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1989, the term “fire fighter” was substituted for “fireman” in this section under § 60, ch. 50, SLA 1989.

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

” was substituted for “this chapter” and “plan” was substituted for “system” in this section.

Administrative Code. —

For benefits under the defined benefit plan ( AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

), see 2 AAC 35, art. 3.

For service under the defined benefit plan ( AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

), see 2 AAC 35, art. 4.